California statutes. Corporations Code
The felonies specified in this chapter are punishable, for each offense, if the offender is a corporation, by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or, if the offender is not a corporation, by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 51.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

29103.

The prosecution, conviction, and punishment of a corporation under any provision of this chapter shall not be deemed to be a prosecution, conviction, or punishment of any of its officers, directors, or shareholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

29104.

All contracts for the purchase or sale of shares of the capital stock of any corporation or association without any intention on the part of one party to deliver and of the other party to receive the shares, and contemplating merely the payment of differences between the contract and market prices on divers days, shall be void, and neither party to any such contract shall be entitled to recover any damages for failure to perform the same, or any money paid thereon, in any court of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 161.)
-------------------------------------------

29105.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Required Records and Statements [29200. - 29201.]

29200.

Every person doing business as a broker or making contracts as a broker or agent for the purchase or sale of any securities or commodities on any board of trade or exchange shall keep or cause to be kept at their office or place of business correct and permanent records or books of account showing each of such transactions as a separate item. The failure so to keep or cause to be kept such records or books of account is prima facie evidence that any such contract was bucketing or bucketshopping.

Such records or books of account shall at all times be open to inspection by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or by any deputy, investigator, or auditor of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation to whom the commissioner may delegate such authority in
 writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 89.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29201.

Every person shall, upon written demand therefor, furnish to any customer or principal for whom he has executed any order for the actual purchase or sale of any securities or commodities on any board of trade or exchange, either for immediate or future delivery, a written statement showing the name of the person from whom the property was bought or to whom it was sold, as the case may be, and the time when, place where, and the price at which it was either bought or sold. If any such person refuses or neglects to furnish such a statement within forty-eight hours after such demand, the refusal or neglect is prima facie evidence that the transaction was bucketing or bucket shopping within the terms of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 386.)
-------------------------------------------



DIVISION 4.5. COMMODITIES [29500. - 29567.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [29500. - 29516.]

29500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “California Commodity Law of 1990.” References herein to “this law” refer to the applicable provisions of this division unless the context otherwise requires. The definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29501.

“Board of trade” means any person or group of persons engaged in buying or selling any commodity or receiving the same for sale on consignment, whether the person or group of persons is characterized as a board of trade, exchange, or other form of marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29502.

“Business days” are all days other than every Saturday, every Sunday and such other days as are specified or provided for as holidays in the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29503.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 90.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29504.

“Commodity” means, except as otherwise specified by the commissioner by rule or order, any agricultural, grain, or livestock product or byproduct, any metal or mineral (including a precious metal set forth in Section 29515), any gem or gemstone (whether characterized as precious, semiprecious, or otherwise), any fuel (whether liquid, gaseous, or otherwise), any foreign currency, and all other goods, articles, products, or items of any kind. However, the term “commodity” shall not include (a) a numismatic coin whose fair market value is at least 15 percent higher than the value of the metal it contains, or (b) any work of art offered or sold by art dealers, at public auction, or through a private sale by the owner of the work of art.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

29505.

(a) “Commodity contract” means any account, agreement, or contract for the purchase or sale, primarily for speculation or investment purposes and not for use or consumption by the offeree or purchaser, of one or more commodities, whether for immediate or subsequent delivery or whether delivery is intended by the parties, and whether characterized as a cash contract, deferred shipment or deferred delivery contract, forward contract, futures contract, installment or margin contract, leverage contract, or otherwise. A “commodity contract” includes a commodity option as defined in Section 29510, unless otherwise specified. Any “commodity contract” offered or sold shall, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, be presumed to be offered or sold for speculation or investment purposes. 

(b) A “commodity contract” shall not include any contract or agreement which requires, and under which the purchaser personally receives, or at the request of the purchaser a family member or an individual (which individual is other than the seller or any affiliate of the seller, including any officer, director, or employee of the seller or any affiliate of the seller) with whom the purchaser has a preexisting close personal or preexisting business relationship personally receives, within 28 calendar days from the full payment in good funds of the purchase price, actual physical delivery of the quantity of each commodity purchased under the contract or agreement. In the case of a seller who requires a partial payment of the total purchase price before obligating itself to actually physically deliver the quantity of each commodity purchased under the contract or agreement described in this subdivision, both the amount remaining on the total purchase price shall be paid in good funds and actual physical delivery of the quantity of each commodity purchased under the contract or agreement shall be personally received (by the purchaser or above-described individual) within 28 calendar days from the date of the partial payment in good funds. Otherwise, for the purposes of this exclusion from the definition of a “commodity contract,” a partial payment of, or an installment payment on, the purchase price is not a full payment in good funds of the purchase price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 262, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29506.

“Commodity Exchange Act” means the federal statute so named, as amended before or after January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29507.

“Commodity Futures Trading Commission” means the independent regulatory agency established by Congress to administer the Commodity Exchange Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29508.

“CFTC Rule” means any rule, regulation, or order of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission in effect on January 1, 1991, and all subsequent amendments, additions, or other revisions thereto, unless the commissioner, within 10 days following the effective date of any amendment, addition, or revision, disallows the application thereof to this law or to any provision thereof by rule or order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29509.

“Commodity merchant” means any of the following, as defined or described in the Commodity Exchange Act or by CFTC Rule:

(a) Futures commission merchant. 

(b) Commodity pool operator. 

(c) Commodity trading advisor. 

(d) Introducing broker. 

(e) Leverage transaction merchant. 

(f) An associated person of any person specified in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive. 

(g) Floor broker. 

(h) Any other person (other than a futures association) required to register with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 262, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

29510.

“Commodity option” means any account, agreement, or contract giving a party thereto the right but not the obligation to purchase or sell one or more commodities or one or more commodity contracts, or both, whether characterized as an option, privilege, indemnity, bid, offer, put, call, advance guaranty, decline guaranty, or otherwise, but shall not include an option traded on a national securities exchange registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29511.

“Financial institution” means (a) a national bank or a bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state, (b) a federal savings and loan association or federal savings bank, or (c) a federally insured bank chartered by a state of the United States when the commodity depository activities of the bank are supervised by the bank regulator of that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29512.

“Good funds” means the verified receipt of immediately available funds according to the applicable requirements of federal Regulation CC.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29513.

“Offer” includes every offer to sell, offer to purchase, or offer to enter into a commodity contract or commodity option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29514.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

29515.

“Precious metal” means the following in either coin, bullion, or other form:

(a) Silver.

(b) Gold.

(c) Platinum.

(d) Palladium.

(e) Copper.

(f) Other items that the commissioner may specify by rule or order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29515.5.

“Purchase price” means all funds paid by or on behalf of a purchaser to a seller of a commodity contract or a commodity option (or to another person at the request or direction of a seller), including, but not limited to, the sale price of a commodity, an administrative charge or fee, assessment, deposit, dues, handling charge or fee, holding charge or fee, membership charge or fee, reservation charge or fee, or any charge, fee, or other payment made or paid in connection with the sale of a commodity contract or a commodity option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 262, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

29516.

“Sale” or “sell” includes every sale, contract of sale, contract to sell, or disposition, for value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Unlawful Commodity Transactions [29520. - 29520.]

29520.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 29530, 29531, or 29532, no person shall sell or purchase or offer to sell or purchase any commodity under any commodity contract or under any commodity option, or offer to enter into, or enter into, as seller or purchaser any commodity contract or any commodity option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [29530. - 29532.]

29530.

(a) The prohibitions in Section 29520 shall not apply to any transaction offered by and in which any of the following persons (or any employee, officer, or director thereof acting solely in that capacity) is the purchaser or seller:

(1) A person registered with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission as a futures commission merchant or as a leverage transaction merchant whose activities require registration.

(2) A person affiliated with, and whose obligations and liabilities under the transaction are guaranteed by, a person referred to in subdivision (a).

(3) A person who is a member of a contract market designated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (or any clearinghouse thereof) when the transaction at issue requires membership in and is subject to the regulatory jurisdiction of that contract market.

(4) A financial institution.

(5) A broker-dealer licensed under Section 25211, or exempt from licensure under Section 25200, when engaging in activities subject to the exclusive regulatory jurisdiction of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.

(6) A person licensed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1800) of Division 1 of the Financial Code to receive money for transmittal to foreign countries if (A) the license has not expired or been surrendered, suspended, or revoked, (B) the licensed person has a tangible net worth of at least 3 million dollars ($3,000,000) according to its audited financial statements prepared by an independent certified public accountant for each of the immediately preceding three fiscal years, and (C) pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 29531, the licensed person issues and a purchaser receives a certificate, document of title, confirmation, or other instrument evidencing that the purchased quantity of precious metals or foreign currencies has been delivered to a depository which is a financial institution located in a state of the United States.

(b) The exemption provided by subdivision (a) shall not apply to any transaction or activity which is prohibited by the Commodity Exchange Act or CFTC Rule.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 705, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

29531.

The prohibitions in Section 29520 shall not apply to the following:

(a) An account, agreement, or transaction within the exclusive regulatory jurisdiction of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission as granted under Section 2 of Title 42 of the United States Code (Section 2(a)(1)(A) of the Commodity Exchange Act). 

(b) A commodity contract for the purchase of one or more precious metals or foreign currencies which requires full payment in good funds of the purchase price and under which the purchaser receives, within 28 calendar days from the full payment in good funds of the purchase price, substitute delivery of the quantity of the precious metals or foreign currencies purchased, or a commodity contract for the purchase of one or more precious metals or foreign currencies which allows partial payment in good funds of the purchase price and under which the purchaser receives within 28 calendar days from the partial payment in good funds of the purchase price, substitute delivery of the quantity of precious metals or foreign currencies purchased by that payment; provided that, for purposes of this subdivision, substitute delivery shall be deemed to have occurred if, within the 28-day period, the quantity of precious metals or foreign currencies purchased by the full or partial payment is actually physically delivered (whether in specifically segregated or fungible bulk form) into the possession of a depository (other than the seller) which is either (1) a financial institution, (2) a depository, the warehouse receipts of which are recognized for delivery purposes for any commodity on a contract market designated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, (3) a storage facility licensed or regulated by the United States or any agency thereof, or (4) a facility for the storage of precious metals or foreign currencies located within a state of the United States and operated by an armored contract carrier defined under subdivision (e), or (5) a depository designated by the commissioner. The depository (or other person which itself qualifies as a depository) enumerated in this subdivision shall issue and the purchaser shall receive a certificate, document of title, confirmation or other instrument evidencing that the quantity of precious metals has been delivered to the depository and is being and will continue to be held by the depository on the purchaser’s behalf, free and clear of all liens and encumbrances, other than liens of the purchaser, tax liens, liens agreed to by the purchaser, or liens of the depository for fees and expenses, which have previously been disclosed to the purchaser. 

(c) A commodity contract solely between persons engaged in producing, processing, using commercially or handling as merchants, each commodity subject thereto, or any byproduct thereof. 

(d) A commodity contract under which the offeree or the purchaser is a person referred to in Section 29530, an insurance company, or an investment company as defined in Section 80a-3 of Title 15 of the United States Code (Section 3 of Title I of the federal Investment Company Act of 1940). 

(e) For the purposes of this section, “armored contract carrier” means a person who: (1) is operating as a carrier transporting coin, currency, precious metals, securities, or negotiable items pursuant to a currently effective permit as a highway contract carrier and a city carrier issued by the Public Utilities Commission of this state and is also operating a facility for the storage of precious metals or foreign currencies pursuant to a commodity contract; (2) has purchased and maintains sufficient amounts of insurance coverage for all risks associated with the operation of a facility for the storage of precious metals or foreign currencies from an insurance company admitted in this state; (3) has continuously operated as a carrier under its permit and has continuously operated a facility for the storage of precious metals or foreign currencies for at least five years; (4) has a tangible net worth of at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) for each of the immediately preceding five fiscal years according to its financial statements prepared on an individual company basis, or on a combining or consolidating basis with any affiliates, which financial statements have been audited by an independent certified public accountant; and (5) provides the following disclosure to a purchaser in 10-point boldface type with the certificate, document of title, confirmation, or other instrument evidencing that the purchased quantity of precious metals or foreign currencies has been delivered to or is on deposit with the storage facility: “(Name of carrier) is not licensed, regulated, or supervised as a depository or storage facility by the United States Government or the State of California.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 262, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

29532.

The commissioner may by rule or order prescribe the terms and conditions of all transactions and contracts covered by this law and exempt any person or transaction from this law conditionally or unconditionally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Unlawful Activities and Fraudulent Conduct [29535. - 29538.]

29535.

(a) No person shall engage in a trade or business or otherwise act as a commodity merchant unless the person (1) is registered or temporarily licensed with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission for each activity constituting that person as a commodity merchant and the registration or temporary license shall not have expired, been suspended, or revoked; or (2) is exempt from the registration by virtue of the Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq.) or of a CFTC rule.

(b) No board of trade shall trade, or provide a place for the trading of, any commodity contract required to be traded on or subject to the rules of a contract market designated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, unless the board of trade has been so designated for the commodity contract and that designation shall not have been vacated, suspended, or revoked.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29536.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, in connection with the purchase or sale of, the offer to sell, the offer to purchase, the offer to enter into, or the entry into, a commodity, commodity contract, or commodity option to do any of the following:

(a) To willfully employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud.

(b) To willfully make any false report, enter any false record, make any untrue statement of a material fact, or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.

(c) To willfully engage in any transaction, act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any persons.

(d) To willfully misappropriate or convert the funds, security, or property of any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29537.

(a) Sections 29520, 29535, and 29536 apply to persons who sell or offer to sell when either of the following occur:

(1) An offer to sell is made in this state.

(2) An offer to buy is made and accepted in this state.

(b) Sections 29520, 29535, and 29536 apply to persons who buy or offer to buy when either of the following occur:

(1) An offer to buy is made in this state.

(2) An offer to sell is made and accepted in this state.

(c) For the purpose of this section, an offer to sell or to buy is made in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offer:

(1) Originates from this state.

(2) Is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to which it is directed (or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed offer).

(d) For the purpose of this section, an offer to buy or to sell is accepted in this state when acceptance:

(1) Is communicated to the offeror in this state.

(2) Has not previously been communicated to the offeror, orally or in writing, outside this state. Acceptance is communicated to the offeror in this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state, reasonably believing the offeror to be in this state and it is received at the place to which it is directed (or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed acceptance).

(e) An offer to sell or to buy is not made in this state when either of the following occur:

(1) The publisher circulates or there is circulated on his or her behalf in this state any bona fide newspaper or other publication of general, regular, and paid circulation which is not published in this state, or which is published in this state but has had more than two-thirds of its circulation outside this state during the past 12 months.

(2) A radio or television program originating outside this state is received in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29538.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers of the Commissioner [29540. - 29546.]

29540.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this law or any rule or order under this law, the commissioner may in his or her discretion bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California in the superior court to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this law or any rule or order under this law. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted and a monitor, receiver, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets, or other ancillary relief may be granted as appropriate.

A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court appointed by the superior court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties, including the filing of a petition for bankruptcy. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner, or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court by reason of their exercising these powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of, the superior court.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution, disgorgement, or damages on behalf of the person injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29541.

(a) The commissioner in his or her discretion (1) may make public or private investigations within or outside of this state that the commissioner deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this law or any rule or order hereunder, or to aid the enforcement of this law or in the prescribing of rules and forms under this law, and (2) may publish information concerning any violation of this law or a rule or order hereunder.

(b) For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this law, the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

(c) In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, the superior court, upon application by the commissioner, may issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear before the commissioner or the officer designated by the commissioner, to produce documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

(d) No person is excused from attending and testifying or from producing any document or record before the commissioner, or in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner or in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner, on the ground that the testimony or evidence (documentary or otherwise) required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a penalty or forfeiture. However, no individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or she is compelled, after validly claiming his or her privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence (documentary or otherwise), except that the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29542.

(a) If, in the opinion of the commissioner, any person is engaging or has engaged in any activity in violation of any provision of this law, or rule or order under this law, the commissioner may order the person to desist and refrain from the activity unless and until the activity will not be in violation of any provision of this law or any rule or order under this law.

(b) If after an order has been made under subdivision (a), a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days of the date of service of the order by the person to whom the order was directed, a hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall
 have all of the powers granted under the Administrative Procedure Act. Unless the hearing is commenced within 15 business days after the request is filed (or the person affected consents to a later date), the order is rescinded.

If that person fails to file a written request for a hearing within 30 days from the date of service of the order, the order shall be deemed a final order of the commissioner and shall not be subject to review by any court or agency, notwithstanding Section 29563.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 4.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

29543.

The commissioner may refer the evidence that is available concerning any violation of this law, or of any rule or order under this law, to the Attorney General or the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred, who may, with or without such a reference, institute appropriate criminal proceedings under this law. The commissioner and the commissioner’s counsel, deputies, or assistants may, upon request of the Attorney General or the district attorney, assist the prosecutor in presenting the law or facts at the trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29544.

(a) Any person who willfully violates any provision of this law, or who willfully violates any rule or order under this law, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction.

The penalty collected shall be paid to the State Corporations Fund to be used for the support of this division.

(b) As applied to the penalties for acts in violation of this division, the remedies provided by this section and by other sections of this division are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination to enforce this division.

(c) No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under subdivision (a) unless brought before the expiration of four years after the act or transaction constituting the violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 876, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

29545.

(a) The commissioner may take actions that are authorized by Section 13a-2 of Title 7 of the United States Code (Section 6d of the federal Commodity Exchange Act) as amended before or after the effective date of this section.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on the powers of the commissioner under this act or any other law administered by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 335, Sec. 12.   (SB 538)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

29546.

The commissioner in his or her discretion may honor requests from interested parties for interpretive opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Crimes and Civil Liability [29550. - 29555.]

29550.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who willfully violates any provision of this law, or who willfully violates any rule or order under this law, shall upon conviction be fined not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or be punished by both a fine and imprisonment; but no person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order if that person proves that he or she had no knowledge of the rule or order.

(b) Any person who willfully violates Section 29536 shall upon conviction be fined not more than two hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($250,000), or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) One-half of the fines collected under this section shall be paid to the State Corporations Fund to be used for the support of this division. The remainder of the fines collected under this section shall be paid to the state or local agency which brought the criminal prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 52.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

29551.

Nothing in this law limits the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29552.

Any person who materially assists in any violation of this law, or any rule or order of the commissioner under this law, is jointly and severally liable with any other person liable under this law for the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29553.

No action shall be maintained to enforce any liability under Section 29552 unless brought before the expiration of four years after the act or transaction constituting the violation or within one year after the discovery by the plaintiff of the facts constituting the violation, whichever occurs last.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29554.

Every cause of action under this law survives the death of any person who might have been a plaintiff or defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29555.

Except as explicitly provided in this law, no civil liability in favor of any private party shall arise against any person by implication from, or as a result of, the violation of any provision of this law or any rule or order under this law. Nothing in this law shall limit any liability which may exist by virtue of any other statute or under common law if this law were not in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Miscellaneous Provisions [29560. - 29567.]

29560.

No provision of this law imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, permit, order, or written interpretive opinion of the commissioner, or any written interpretive opinion of the Attorney General, notwithstanding that the rule, form, permit, order, or written interpretive opinion may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29561.

The commissioner may from time to time make, amend, and rescind the rules, forms, and orders that are necessary to carry out this law, and define any terms, whether or not used in this law, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with this law. For the purpose of rules, the commissioner may classify commodities, commodity contracts, commodity options, and persons within the commissioner’s jurisdiction and may prescribe different requirements for different classes. The commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, waive any requirement of any rule or form in situations where in his or her opinion the requirement is not necessary in the public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29562.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29563.

Every final order, decision, certificate, registration, or other official act of the commissioner is subject to judicial review in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29564.

Nothing in this law, shall impair, derogate, or otherwise affect the authority or powers of the commissioner under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Part 3 (commencing with Section 25000)) or the application of any provision thereof to any person or transaction subject thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

29565.
